Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3998.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 85.012, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 26a. new text end new text begin Melissa and Mark Hortman Memorial State Park, Ramsey County. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 85.054, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 20. new text end new text begin Melissa and Mark Hortman Memorial State Park. new text end new text begin A state park permit is not required and a fee may not be charged for entry into Melissa and Mark Hortman Memorial State Park. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin MELISSA AND MARK HORTMAN MEMORIAL STATE PARK.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin Melissa and Mark Hortman Memorial State Park is established in Ramsey County. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Boundaries. new text end new text begin The boundaries of Melissa and Mark Hortman Memorial State Park in the city of St. Paul are described as follows: new text end new text begin (1) beginning at the point of intersection of the centerline of Pennsylvania Avenue and the centerline of Marion Street; new text end new text begin (2) then go southerly along the centerline of Marion Street and its extension to a point 50 feet southerly of the south curb of Concordia Avenue; new text end new text begin (3) then southeasterly along a line 50 feet southerly of, and parallel with, the south curb of Concordia Avenue to a point 125 feet westerly of the west curb of southbound John Ireland Boulevard; new text end new text begin (4) then southwesterly along a line 125 feet westerly of, and parallel with, the west curb of southbound John Ireland Boulevard to the south curb of Dayton Avenue; new text end new text begin (5) then easterly along the south curb of Dayton Avenue to the west curb of southbound John Ireland Boulevard; new text end new text begin (6) then northeasterly in a straight line to the intersection of the centerline of Old Kellogg Boulevard and the centerline of Summit Avenue; new text end new text begin (7) then northeasterly along the centerline of Summit Avenue to the centerline of eastbound new West Kellogg Boulevard; new text end new text begin (8) then southeasterly along the centerline of eastbound and then southbound new West Kellogg Boulevard to the easterly right-of-way line of Interstate Highway 35-E; new text end new text begin (9) then northeasterly along the easterly right-of-way line of Interstate Highway 35-E to the southerly right-of-way line of Interstate Highway 94; new text end new text begin (10) then easterly along the southerly right-of-way line of Interstate Highway 94 to the west curb of St. Peter Street; new text end new text begin (11) then southeasterly along the west curb of St. Peter Street to the south curb of Exchange Street; new text end new text begin (12) then northeasterly along the south curb of Exchange Street to the west curb of Cedar Street; new text end new text begin (13) then northwesterly along the west curb of Cedar Street to the centerline of Tenth Street; new text end new text begin (14) then northeasterly along the centerline of Tenth Street to the centerline of Minnesota Street; new text end new text begin (15) then northwesterly along the centerline of Minnesota Street to the centerline of Eleventh Street; new text end new text begin (16) then northeasterly along the centerline of Eleventh Street to the centerline of Jackson Street; new text end new text begin (17) then northerly along the centerline of Jackson Street to the centerline of Pennsylvania Avenue; and new text end new text begin (18) then westerly along the centerline of Pennsylvania Avenue and its extension to the point of beginning. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Management. new text end new text begin Except as provided in this section, the commissioner of natural resources must administer all state land within the boundary of Melissa and Mark Hortman Memorial State Park in the same manner provided by law for other state parks. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Buildings and monuments. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of administration and the Minnesota Historical Society retain authority to manage all state buildings located within the boundaries of Melissa and Mark Hortman Memorial State Park at the time of establishment. The commissioner of administration, with input from the commissioner of natural resources, may modify or demolish state buildings in existence at the time of establishment or construct new buildings within Melissa and Mark Hortman Memorial State Park as provided by law. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of natural resources, with input from the Capitol Area Architectural and Planning Board, controls all state monuments within Melissa and Mark Hortman Memorial State Park at the time of establishment and may erect and maintain additional monuments, informational kiosks, and other structures for interpretative, educational, or administrative purposes. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 86A.05, subdivision 2, the commissioner may manage Melissa and Mark Hortman Memorial State Park for historic and cultural purposes and physical development is not limited to facilities necessary to complement natural features. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin MELISSA AND MARK HORTMAN MEMORIAL STATE PARK MANAGEMENT; REPORT.new text end new text begin By January 15, 2027, the commissioner of natural resources, in consultation with the Capitol Area Architectural and Planning Board, the commissioner of administration, and the Minnesota Historical Society, must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over state government finance and environment and natural resources with recommendations for implementing this act, including any necessary statutory changes. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the ...... fund to the commissioner of natural resources to establish and manage Melissa and Mark Hortman Memorial State Park. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin Sections 1 to 3 are effective July 1, 2027. new text end